Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1306
Virgin prairie; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Examples of Nebraska's prairie soil in a condition which existed before the state was settled during the early part of the nineteenth century are becoming increasingly rare;

(2) Such virgin prairie is an important tool for scientists who seek to determine the highest and best use of Nebraska's soil resources;

(3) Such virgin prairie is an important part of botanical and zoological studies offered by institutions of learning in this state; and

(4) It is in the public interest that such virgin prairie which has been used as an educational tool by an educational institution of this state in suitable quantities be preserved and protected.

Laws 1981, LB 58, § 1.